Hawaii statutes.
[§503B-3] Powers; charges. A
commissioner, in any foreign country; in international waters; and in any
possession, territory, or commonwealth of the United States, may administer
oaths and take acknowledgments and proofs of execution of any deed, assignment
of lease, apartment deed and ground lease, condominium conveyance document,
mortgage, deed of trust, contract, power of attorney, or any other instrument
or writing to be used or recorded in the State in connection with:

(1) A time share interest;

(2) Any property subject to a time share plan; or

(3) The operation of a time share plan that includes
any property located within the State;

provided that the instrument or writing is executed
outside of the fifty states and the District of Columbia. Oaths, acknowledgments,
and proofs of execution shall be taken or made in the manner provided by the
laws of the State, including but not limited to sections 502-42, 502-43,
502-48, 502-61, 502-62, and 502-63, and shall be certified by the commissioner
under the commissioner's official seal. The certification shall be endorsed on
or attached to the instrument or writing and shall have the same effect as if
made or taken in the State by a notary public commissioned in the State.
Charges made by commissioners for services rendered shall be no higher than the
rates authorized by any law governing similar services rendered by notaries
within the jurisdictions in which the services are performed. [L 2013, c 277,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next